Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1251
Boat livery; records required.

The owner of a boat livery shall cause to be kept a record of the name and address of the person or persons hiring any vessel which is designed or permitted by him to be operated as a motorboat, the certificate of number thereof, the departure date and time, and the expected time of return. The record shall be preserved for at least six months.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 51.